Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights of unwed father to obstruct adoption of his child by withholding consent, 61 ALR5th 151.

2 C.J.S. Adoption of Persons §§ 1 to 112.

§ 1-22-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Agency” means any person legally empowered to place children for adoption or a certified private child welfare agency or the department of family services;

“Child” means the minor person to be adopted;

“Parent” means the child’s father or mother whose parental rights have not been judicially terminated;

“Putative father” means the alleged or reputed father of a child born out of wedlock, whether or not the paternity rights and obligations of the father have been judicially determined;

“This act” means W.S.

1-22-101

through

1-22-114

.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 59, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-707.1, 1-726.1; Laws 1977, ch. 187, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

As to certified child care facilities, see §§

14-3-206

to

14-3-209

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

“Parent” defined. —

The father is the parent intended under the provision of the former section, but where he has abandoned the child he relinquishes all claims and the mother becomes the parent within the meaning of the word “parent.” Nugent v. Powell, 4 Wyo. 173, 33 P. 23,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1893).

“Abandonment” defined. —

Abandonment imparts any conduct on the part of the parent which evinces a settled purpose to forego all parental duties and relinquish all parental claims to the child and involves more than mere temporary absence or temporary neglect of parental duty. In re Adoption of Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1948), overruled in part, T.C. v. State (In re Adoption of L-MHB), 2018 WY 140, 431 P.3d 560,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2018).

Official declaration of paternity not relevant to contested
adoption cases. —

The putative father had standing to contest the adoption and had established a claim to paternity as required by §

1-22-108

(c)(i), although he failed to establish his paternity within three years of the child's birth, as required by § 14-2-105. The explicit standing requirement of §

1-22-108

must control in the adoption context. Moreover, when the legislature defined “putative father” to include an alleged father “whether or not the paternity rights and obligations of the father have been judicially determined” (subsection (a)(iv)), it clearly indicated that an official declaration of paternity was not relevant to contested adoption cases. In re Adoption of GSD, 716 P.2d 984,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 521

(Wyo. 1986).

Equitable adoption. —

The Supreme Court declined to apply the doctrine of equitable adoption to affect the distribution of a testate estate, as adoption and probate are both statutory procedures, with formalities designed to ensure certainty, and where neither the applicable statutes nor the last will and testament were ambiguous, neither legislative intent nor testamentary intent depended upon a resort to equity. Sanderson v. Bathrick (In re Estate of Seader), 2003 WY 119, 76 P.3d 1236,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

BDR v. BEB, 888 P.2d 216,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility of expert testimony regarding questions of domestic law, 66 ALR5th 135.

Grandparents' visitation rights where child's parents are deceased, or where status of parents is unspecified, 69 ALR5th 1.

Grandparents' visitation rights where child's parents are living, 71 ALR5th 99.

“Wrongful adoption” causes of action against adoption agencies where children have or develop mental or physical problems that are misrepresented or not disclosed to adoptive parents, 74 ALR5th 1.

§ 1-22-102.
Persons
subject to adoption.

Any child may be adopted who is within this state when the petition for adoption is filed.

Any adult may be adopted, regardless of his residence within or outside of this state at the time the petition is filed, provided:

The adopting parent was a stepparent, grandparent or other blood relative, foster parent or legal guardian who participated in the raising of the adult when the adult was a child; and

The adult files a consent to the adoption with the court.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 59, § 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-707.2, 1-726.2; Laws 1977, ch. 187, § 1; 2009, ch. 65, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, designated the existing paragraph as (a) and added (b), and substituted “child” for “person” preceding “may be adopted” in (a).

Child's domicile when petition filed as relevant element. —

This state is the proper forum for an adoption proceeding where the adoptive parents reside in the state and the child is domiciled within the state at the time the petition for adoption is filed, even though the natural mother is domiciled in a foreign jurisdiction which is also the birthplace of the child. In re Adoption of MM, 652 P.2d 974,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Marital or sexual relationship between parties as affecting right to adopt, 42 ALR4th 776.

§ 1-22-103.
Adopting parties.

Any adult person who
has resided in this state during the sixty (60) days immediately preceding
the filing of the petition for adoption and who is determined by the
court to be fit and competent to be a parent may adopt in accordance
with this act.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 59, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-703.3, 1-726.3; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 187, § 1; 1986, ch. 118, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-22-101(a)(v).

Quoted

in

In re Adoption of MM, 652 P.2d 974,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Age of prospective adoptive parent as factor in adoption proceedings, 84 ALR3d 665.

Library References.

Family Law and Practice § 64.07 (Matthew Bender).

§ 1-22-104.
Petition for adoption of minor; by whom filed; requisites, confidential nature;
inspection; separate journal to be kept.

Adoption proceedings shall be commenced by a petition filed in district court. The district court may transfer jurisdiction of a petition to adopt a child to the juvenile court if the child proposed for adoption in the petition is under the prior and continuing jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

A petition may be filed by any single adult or jointly by a husband and wife who maintain their home together, or by either the husband or wife if the other spouse is a parent of the child.

The following documents shall be filed with every petition to adopt a child:

The appropriate consent to adoption pursuant to W.S.

1-22-109

;

Any relinquishments as provided by W.S.

1-22-109

necessary to show the court that the person or agency legally authorized to have custody and control of the child prior to the adoption, has duly relinquished the child to the petitioners for adoption;

A report of the medical examination of the child made by a licensed Wyoming physician within thirty (30) days immediately preceding the filing of the petition to adopt. The report shall be made on forms provided by the department of family services. A medical report shall not be required when a parent of the child joins in the petition to adopt or when the child resided with the adoptive parents for more than six (6) months prior to filing the petition;

An affidavit from each petitioner setting forth:

Any previous or current diagnosed psychiatric disorders of the petitioner;

All felony convictions of the petitioner within the preceding ten (10) years;

All misdemeanor convictions of the petitioner within the preceding five (5) years;

The current parole or probation status of the petitioner, if any.

An affidavit stating the name or names of persons awarded visitation rights to the child under W.S.

20-7-101

or

20-7-102

or an affidavit stating that no visitation rights under W.S.

20-7-101

or

20-7-102

have been awarded in regard to the child;

A form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar of vital records. The form shall be completed to the extent possible with the information required under W.S. 35-1-416(a) including:

The name of the child prior to adoption;

Sex;

Date of birth;

Place of birth;

Birth certificate number;

Natural mother’s full maiden name; and

Natural father’s full name.

The petition and documents filed pursuant to this section, and the interlocutory decree, if entered, and the final decree of adoption shall constitute a confidential file and shall be available for inspection only to the judge, or, by order of court, to the parties to the proceedings or their attorneys, except as provided in W.S.

35-1-416

. Upon the entry of the final decree of adoption, all records in the proceedings shall be sealed and may be available for inspection only by order of court for good cause shown. The court may order inspection of all or part of the confidential file in adoption proceedings only if it appears to the court that the welfare and best interests of the child will be served by the inspection.

The court may order inspection of all or any part of the confidential file upon a proper motion made pursuant to W.S.

1-22-203

(b). Any order permitting inspection under this subsection shall preserve the anonymity of the natural parents, the adoptive parents and the child and shall provide that the inspection is subject to the provisions of W.S.

1-22-203

. Documents filed pursuant to W.S. 1-22-203(b) or this subsection shall become part of the confidential file.

For purposes of this section, “convicted” includes pleas of guilty, nolo contendere, verdicts of guilty upon which a judgment of conviction may be rendered and dispositions pursuant to W.S.

7-13-301

and

35-7-1037

.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 184, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-708, 1-726.4; Laws 1959, ch. 45, § 1; 1963, ch. 59, § 4; 1965, ch. 39, § 1; 1973, ch. 91, § 1; ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 187, § 1; 1983, ch. 14, § 1; 1987, ch. 178, § 1; 1991, ch. 125, § 2; ch. 161, § 3; 1999, ch. 111, § 1; 2007, ch. 127, § 1; 2009, ch. 196, § 1; 2018 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (c)(v).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the second sentence in (a).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (c)(vi); and in (d), added “except as provided in W.S.

35-1-416

” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (d), deleted the third sentence, which read: “The clerk of court shall maintain a separate journal for adoption proceedings to be confidential and available for inspection only by order of the court for good cause shown.”

Common law. —

At the common law adoption was unknown. In re Cadwell's Estate, 26 Wyo. 412, 186 P. 499,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1920).

Adoption is statutory and statute must be conformed to. —

Adoption is entirely statutory, and the proceedings must be conducted in substantial conformity with the provisions of the statute. In re Adoption of Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1948), overruled in part, T.C. v. State (In re Adoption of L-MHB), 2018 WY 140, 431 P.3d 560,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2018).

Stepfather held “related to the child to be adopted.” —

A stepfather whose wife had died before his petition for adoption of minor stepdaughter was filed was considered related by marriage to the stepdaughter at the time of his petition within the exception of this section which states that a medical report shall not be required in an adoption proceeding where one or both of the adopting parents is related to the child by either blood or marriage. Adoption of Petersen, 486 P.2d 887,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1971).

Counterclaim for care of children. —

In adoption proceedings parties seeking to adopt were not permitted to litigate money claims for the care of children by way of a counterclaim against the children's father, who had filed an application to be heard in opposition to the petition. In re Adoption of Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1948), overruled in part, T.C. v. State (In re Adoption of L-MHB), 2018 WY 140, 431 P.3d 560,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2018).

Informal records. —

In the absence of any statute prescribing the manner in which a judge's record should be kept, or of evidence showing that he kept them in any other way than by writing them out on sheets of paper, record on detached piece of paper retained among the papers of his office, showing his consent and approval of adoption of a child, was sufficient. Nugent v. Powell, 4 Wyo. 173, 33 P. 23,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1893).

Petition improperly denied. —

District court erred in denying petitioner’s unopposed Petition for Adoption of Minor Child on the basis that he did not qualify to file an adoption petition because he was married and thus not a “single adult,” and he did not jointly file to adopt the child with his current wife, because the adoption statutes did not prohibit petitioner from adopting the child, and the adoption, if finalized, would not impact the mother’s parental rights.
In re Atws, 2021 WY 62, 486 P.3d 158,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2021).

Applied

in

In re Adoption of MM, 652 P.2d 974,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1982); In re Adoption of BGD, 713 P.2d 1191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 475

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

In re Adoption of R.S.C., 837 P.2d 1089,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1992); Shippey v. Rogers (In re Estate of Kirkpatrick), 2003 WY 125, 77 P.3d 404,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2003); Hede v. Gilstrap, 2005 WY 24, 107 P.3d 158,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(2005); DM v. State (In re L-MHB), 2017 WY 110, 401 P.3d 949,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2017); DM v. State (In re L-MHB), 2017 WY 110, 401 P.3d 949,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Family Law — Contested Consent to Adoption: No Longer a Decision in the Child's Best Interest. In re Adoption of BGD, 713 P.2d 1191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 475

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 203 (1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Necessity and sufficiency of consent to adoption by spouse of adopting parent, 38 ALR4th 768.

Restricting access to judicial records of concluded adoption proceedings, 103 ALR5th 255.

§ 1-22-105.
Hearings to be closed; attendance of parties.

Unless the court orders a hearing in open court, all hearings in adoption proceedings shall be confidential and held in closed court or court chambers. No person shall be admitted except court officials, parties to the proceeding, counsel, nonconsenting parents, the nonconsenting putative father of the child and witnesses.

The petitioners and the child shall appear at the hearing unless excused by the court.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 59, § 5; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-708.1, 1-726.5; Laws 1977, ch. 187, § 1.

Standing. —

District court correctly determined that, because natural father consented to adoption in sworn affidavit filed with court, he did not have standing to request or attend a hearing on merits of the adoption.

Stated

in

MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Hede v. Gilstrap, 2005 WY 24, 107 P.3d 158,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(2005).

§ 1-22-106.
When petition to be filed; order for hearing.

A petition to adopt a
child shall be filed upon the entry of the child in the adoptive home
or as soon thereafter as is reasonably convenient. When a petition
is filed and presented to the judge, he shall set the petition for
hearing. Any person whose consent to adoption is required by W.S.

1-22-109

and whose consent has not been filed shall be ordered
to appear on the day set and show cause why the petition to adopt
should not be granted and a decree of adoption entered.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 121, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 20-202; C.S. 1945, § 58-206; Laws 1955, ch. 187, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-709, 1-726.6; Laws 1963, ch. 59, § 6; 1965, ch. 5, § 1; 1977, ch. 187, § 1.

Quoted

in

Morris v. Jackson, 66 Wyo. 369, 212 P.2d 78,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1949).

Stated

in

MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Lucas v. Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1948).

§ 1-22-107.
Service
of petition and order; when service by publication permitted; exception.

Prior to the hearing a copy of the petition to adopt a child and all orders to show cause shall be served on any persons whose consent to adoption is required by W.S.

1-22-109

and whose consent has not been filed with the petition to adopt. Service shall be made in the same manner as provided for by rule 4 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure and shall be accomplished so that a default judgment could be rendered at the hearing against the person served. Service by publication is specifically allowed where the defendant resides out of state, or his residence cannot, with reasonable diligence, be ascertained.

The petition and orders to show cause need not be served upon parents or other persons whose rights to the child have been terminated in a prior judicial proceeding.

Prior to the hearing a copy of the petition to adopt a child and an order to show cause shall be served on any persons awarded visitation rights to the child under W.S.

20-7-101

or

20-7-102

. The consent of persons awarded visitation rights to the adoption is not required. However, the court may exercise its discretion to allow those persons an opportunity to be heard if the court finds it to be in the best interest and welfare of the child.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 121, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 20-203; C.S. 1945, § 58-207; Laws 1945, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-710, 1-726.7; Laws 1977, ch. 187, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 16, § 1; 2007, ch. 127, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to judicial termination of parental rights, see §

14-2-308

et seq.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (c).

Failure to exercise due diligence. —

An adoptive father failed to exercise the requisite due diligence in attempting to locate the natural father prior to serving by publication, where he merely questioned his wife as to the natural father's location and examined the telephone directory of a city which he had reasonable cause to suspect was not the natural father's location. In re Adoption of CAM, 861 P.2d 1102,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1993).

Effect of failure to give notice to parent. —

Even though adoption proceedings were without effect as to the father of the child, by reason of failure to give him notice as required by this section, the father was not entitled to obtain custody of the child on habeas corpus, where the evidence showed that the best interest and welfare of the child would be served by leaving it in the custody of the purported adoptive parents. Morris v. Jackson, 66 Wyo. 369, 212 P.2d 78,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1949).

Cited

in

Lucas v. Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1948); In re JLB, 914 P.2d 828,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1996); Hede v. Gilstrap, 2005 WY 24, 107 P.3d 158,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(2005).

§ 1-22-108.
Hearing on petition and objections; findings by court; effect of
default.

When the persons required to be served as provided in W.S.

1-22-107

have been served personally or by publication and do not appear at the hearing, a default shall be entered against them and they shall be bound by the findings and judgment of the court.

When any person whose consent is required objects to the petition to adopt, he shall at least five (5) days before the hearing file his objections and serve them on all parties to the proceedings, including any person whose consent has been filed.

If the putative father files and serves his objections to the petition to adopt as provided in subsection (b) of this section, and appears at the hearing to acknowledge his paternity of the child, the court shall hear the evidence in support of the petition to adopt and in support of the objection to the petition and shall then determine whether:

The putative father’s claim to paternity of the child is established;

The putative father having knowledge of the birth or pending birth of the child has evidenced an interest in and responsibility for the child within thirty (30) days after receiving notice of the pending birth or birth of the child;

The putative father’s objections to the petition to adopt are valid; and

The best interests and welfare of the child will be served by granting the putative father’s claim to paternity or by allowing the petition to adopt.

The putative father has no right to assert paternity in adoption, dependency or termination of parental rights proceedings unless he is known and identified by the mother or agency, or unless he has lived with or married the mother after the birth of the child and prior to the filing of the petition to adopt, and unless prior to the interlocutory hearing of the adoption proceedings, he has acknowledged the child as his own by affirmatively asserting paternity as provided in this section or registered as a putative father under W.S.

1-22-117

.

Based upon its determination and findings after a hearing, the court may enter its order or decree in accordance with W.S.

1-22-111

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 187, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-726.8; Laws 1995, ch. 170, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to default judgment, see Rule 55, W.R.C.P.

Constitutionality. —

This section does not facially violate the constitution or encompass a discriminatory motive; it does not favor mothers over fathers, women over men, or adoptive parents over birth parents. GWJ v. MH (In re BGH), 930 P.2d 371,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1996).

Strict construction. —

Adoption statutes are strictly construed when the proceeding is against a nonconsenting parent, and every reasonable intendment is made in favor of that parent's claims; such strict construction is mandated by the fact that parental rights are fundamental rights. GWJ v. MH (In re BGH), 930 P.2d 371,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1996).

District court properly treated subsection (c) as a complete and independent adoption statute,

regardless of whether §

1-22-110

might also apply. Section

1-22-110

provides a set of circumstances, such as the nonconsenting party's abuse, abandonment or failure to support the child, under which an adoption is justified no matter who the nonconsenting party is. But the more liberal adoption test of this section applies to only those adoptions contested by putative fathers who have already shown their lack of concern for their children by failing to establish legal paternity. In re Adoption of GSD, 716 P.2d 984,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 521

(Wyo. 1986).

Putative father had standing
to contest the adoption

and had established a claim to
paternity as required by subsection (c)(i), although he failed to
establish his paternity within three years of the child's birth, as
required by former § 14-2-105. The explicit standing requirement of
this section must control in the adoption context. Moreover, when
the legislature defined “putative father” to include an alleged father
“whether or not the paternity rights and obligations of the father
have been judicially determined” (§ 1-22-101(a)(iv)), it clearly indicated that an official declaration of
paternity was not relevant to contested adoption cases.
In re Adoption of GSD, 716 P.2d 984,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 521

(Wyo. 1986).

Putative father's “interest in and responsibility for” child.
—

Where evidence is uncontradicted that when father first learned that mother was pregnant with his child, he agreed she should not get an abortion, and he provided financial support and prenatal care while she lived with him, putative father showed “interest in and responsibility for” child pursuant to subsection (c)(ii). In a contested adoption case, the test is not what the father could or should have done, but what he did do within 30 days after he received notice of the pending birth of his child. In re Adoption of BBC, 831 P.2d 197,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. May 8, 1992).

Putative father's interest in child expressed by visits, offer
of support, and gifts. —

The putative father expressed an interest in the child within the 30-day period by visiting the child immediately after birth, by offering his support immediately after the birth, and by bringing substantial gifts for the child, including clothing, at the initial visit. In re Adoption of GSD, 716 P.2d 984,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 521

(Wyo. 1986).

But absence of subsequent attempt to be father establishes
abandonment. —

The court did not abuse its discretion when it found a good relationship between the child and the adopting stepfather and when it found that the putative father had willfully abandoned the child by not visiting for 20 months prior to the trial although he knew the location of the child at all times, by never trying to establish his paternity through legal process, and by never attempting to be a father to the child in any substantial way; therefore, the court correctly held that the putative father had no valid objections to the adoption. In re Adoption of GSD, 716 P.2d 984,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 521

(Wyo. 1986).

Termination of parental rights. —

In an adoption proceeding, the provisions regarding termination of parental rights found in this article control over the more general provisions for the termination of parental rights found in the paternity statutes. GWJ v. MH (In re BGH), 930 P.2d 371,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

Hede v. Gilstrap, 2005 WY 24, 107 P.3d 158,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(2005).

Stated

in

In re JLB, 914 P.2d 828,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

BDR v. BEB, 888 P.2d 216,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1995); MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights of unwed father to obstruct adoption of his child by withholding consent, 61 ALR5th 151.

§ 1-22-109.
Consent to adoption.

A written relinquishment of custody of the child to be adopted and written consent to adoption shall be filed with the petition to adopt and shall be signed by:

Both parents, if living; or

The surviving parent; or

The mother and putative father of the child if the name of the putative father is known; or

The mother alone if she does not know the name of the putative father, in which case she shall sign and file an affidavit so stating and the court shall determine whether the putative father has registered under W.S.

1-22-117

and if so, shall require notice to be given to the putative father; or

The legal guardian of the person of the child if neither parent is living or if parental rights have been judicially terminated; or

The executive head of the agency to whom the child has been relinquished for adoption; or

The person having exclusive legal custody of the child by court order; or

The legally appointed guardian of any parent or putative father who has been adjudged mentally incompetent.

If the child to be adopted is over the age of fourteen (14) years his written consent to adoption shall also be filed with the petition to adopt.

The consent to adoption shall be signed any time after the birth of the child. The consent shall be acknowledged or may be approved in the following manner:

The consent shall be acknowledged by a:

Person authorized to take acknowledgments;

Representative of the department of family services; or

Representative of a certified agency to whom the custody of the child is being relinquished for adoption.

If not acknowledged as provided in paragraph (i) of this subsection, the consent to adoption may be approved by the court after:

The person giving the consent has appeared before the court in an informal hearing in court chambers; and

The court finds that the consent is knowingly and voluntarily given.

Consent to adoption and the relinquishment of a child for adoption are irrevocable unless obtained by fraud or duress, except that if the court should deny the adoption on account of a claim or objection of the putative father of the child, the court may also allow the mother of the child to withdraw her consent and relinquishment. The consent or relinquishment by a parent who is a minor is valid and may not be revoked solely because of minority.

The consent to adoption and the relinquishment of custody of a child for adoption may be contained in a single instrument.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 121, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 20-204; Laws 1933, ch. 99, § 1; 1941, ch. 112, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 58-208, 58-211, 58-217; Laws 1953, ch. 122, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-710.1, 1-710.3, 1-710.4, 1-714, 1-717, 1-722, 1-726.9; Laws 1963, ch. 59, §§ 7, 9, 10; 1977, ch. 187, § 1; 1986, ch. 118, § 1; 1987, ch. 178, § 1; 1989, ch. 40, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1995, ch. 170, § 2; 1998, ch. 7, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

As to state children's home, see §

25-1-201

.

Practice and procedure. —

Natural parents' consent to adoption of child is a jurisdictional prerequisite to a valid and binding decree of adoption, and therefore court may determine validity of a natural parent's consent without regard to whether adoptive parents have been joined. JK v. MK, 5 P.3d 782,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2000), overruled in part, T.C. v. State (In re Adoption of L-MHB), 2018 WY 140, 431 P.3d 560,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2018).

Statutory requirements not followed. —

District court did not have jurisdiction to consider grandparents' petition to adopt a child where the statutory requirements of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-11-109

were not followed; the mother specifically denied that the name of the putative father was unknown, and thus the district court could not proceed with the adoption without the written relinquishment and written consent to adoption signed by the putative father, at least without a determination as to whether the name of the putative father was, or was not, known. CLT v. SJT (In re JWT), 2005 WY 4, 104 P.3d 93,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2005), overruled in part, T.C. v. State (In re Adoption of L-MHB), 2018 WY 140, 431 P.3d 560,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2018).

Effect of abandonment of child by parent. —

The “parents” whose consent to an adoption was required under former §§ 58-201 and 58-202, W.C.S. 1945, were held to be parents who had not by abandonment lost the right to the care, custody and control of their children. In re Adoption of Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1948), overruled in part, T.C. v. State (In re Adoption of L-MHB), 2018 WY 140, 431 P.3d 560,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2018) (construing former §§ 58-201, 58-202, W.C.S. 1945).

The mother of a child cannot bind its father by her relinquishment

since for adoption to be permitted, the written consent of the father is required unless he has abandoned the child. Peters v. Campbell, 80 Wyo. 492, 345 P.2d 234,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1959).

Relinquishment in writing after birth required. —

The natural mother did not physically relinquish the child, and she did not relinquish the child in writing after her birth, as contemplated by statute. Therefore, the adoption was invalid. In re Adoption of BGD, 713 P.2d 1191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 475

(Wyo. 1986) (decided prior to 1986 amendment).

Fraudulent representations must relate to past or existing
fact. —

When fraud is alleged in the context of an adoption consent, the representations must relate to a past or existing fact, and may not ordinarily be predicated upon a representation which relates to the future. It must be established by clear and convincing evidence. In re Adoption of P., 583 P.2d 706,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 1978).

Duress deemed act performed without free will. —

Duress, referred to in subsection (d), has been said to exist whenever one, by the unlawful act of another, is induced to perform some act under circumstances which deprive him of the exercise of free will. In re Adoption of P., 583 P.2d 706,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 1978); In re Adoption of MM, 652 P.2d 974,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1982).

Fraud and duress not found. —

Minor father's consent to adoption of his child was not secured by either fraud or duress, and therefore district court did not err in finding father's consent irrevocable as a matter of law. JK v. MK, 5 P.3d 782,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2000), overruled in part, T.C. v. State (In re Adoption of L-MHB), 2018 WY 140, 431 P.3d 560,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2018).

Undue influence is not separate ground for revocation of consent for adoption.

In re TR, 777 P.2d 1106,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1989).

Mistake. —

Father's consent to adoption was not vitiated by his mistaken belief that he had six months within which to revoke his consent, where his mistake was not known and could not have been known by private agency arranging placement of his child. JK v. MK, 5 P.3d 782,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2000), overruled in part, T.C. v. State (In re Adoption of L-MHB), 2018 WY 140, 431 P.3d 560,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2018).

Attempt to revoke untimely. —

Natural father's attempt to revoke his consent and vacate final adoption decree more than two years after entry of decree was untimely, and he was not entitled to relief from decree. LVW v. J (In re MSVW), 965 P.2d 1158,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1998).

Cited

in

Nugent v. Powell, 4 Wyo. 173, 33 P. 23,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 9

, 20 L.R.A. 199 (1893); Lucas v. Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1948); State ex rel. TRL v. RLP, 772 P.2d 1054,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1989); In re Adoption of R.S.C., 837 P.2d 1089,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1992).

Stated

in

E.R.C.K. v. State Dep't of Family Servs., 2013 WY 160, 314 P.3d 1170,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Dec 24, 2013).

Law reviews. —

“Administrative Problems Relating to Adoption,” 8 Wyo. L.J. 210.

For case note, “Family Law — Contested Consent to Adoption: No Longer a Decision in the Child's Best Interest. In re Adoption of BGD, 713 P.2d 1191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 475

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 203 (1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Consent of divorced parents as essential to adoption, 47 ALR2d 824.

Necessity of securing consent of parents of illegitimate child to its adoption, 51 ALR2d 497.

What constitutes “undue influence” in obtaining parent's consent to adoption of child, 50 ALR3d 918.

Right of natural parent to withdraw valid consent to adoption of child, 74 ALR3d 421.

Mistake or want of understanding as ground for revocation of consent to adoption or of agreement releasing infant to adoption placement agency, 74 ALR3d 489.

What constitutes “duress” in obtaining parent's consent to adoption of child or surrender of child to adoption agency, 74 ALR3d 527.

Adoption of child in absence of statutorily required consent of public or private agency or institution, 83 ALR3d 373.

Validity of birth parent's “blanket” consent to adoption which fails to identify adoptive parents, 15 ALR5th 1.

Natural parent's indigence as precluding finding that failure to support child waived requirement of consent to adoption — Factors other than employment status, 84 ALR5th 191.